Alabama, session 2026rs, SB198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
46 Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
47 following terms have the following meanings:
48 (1) FACILTY. A facility where prosthetic, orthotic, or
49 pedorthic care is provided.
50 (2) NATIONAL CERTIFYING ENTITY. Any national
51 credentialing organization for ensuring the safe and effective
52 provision of orthotic, prosthetic, or pedorthic services that
53 is approved by the Secretary of State, including the American
54 Board for Certification in Orthotics, Prosthetics and
55 Pedorthics and the Board of Certification/Accreditation.
56 (3) ORTHOSIS. A custom-fabricated, definitive brace or
Page 2

(3) ORTHOSIS. A custom-fabricated, definitive brace or
SB198 INTRODUCED
57 support that is designed for long-term use. Except for the
58 treatment of scoliosis, the term does not include
59 prefabricated or direct-formed orthotic devices or
60 commercially available knee orthoses used following injury or
61 surgery, upper extremity adaptive equipment, finger splints,
62 leather wrist gauntlets, face masks used following burns,
63 wheelchair seating that is an integral part of the wheelchair
64 and not worn by the patient independent of the wheelchair,
65 fabric or elastic supports, corsets, arch supports, also known
66 as non-custom or prefabricated orthotics, low-temperature
67 formed plastic splints, trusses, elastic hose, canes,
68 crutches, cervical collars, dental appliances, and other
69 similar devices such as those commonly carried in stock by a
70 pharmacy, hospital, rehabilitation facility, department store,
71 corset shop, or surgical supply facility.
72 (4) ORTHOTICS. The science and practice of evaluating,
73 measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting,
74 adjusting, or servicing, as well as providing the initial
75 training necessary to accomplish the fitting of, an orthosis
76 for the support, correction, or alleviation of neuromuscular
77 or musculoskeletal dysfunction, disease, injury, or deformity.
78 The term includes all of the following:
79 a. Evaluations, consultation, and continuing care, with
80 basic observational gait and posture analysis.
81 b. Assessing the need for and measuring, designing,
82 manufacturing, and fitting orthoses to maximize function and
83 provide the support and alignment necessary to prevent or
84 correct deformity or to improve the safety and efficiency of
Page 3

correct deformity or to improve the safety and efficiency of
SB198 INTRODUCED
85 mobility or locomotion, or both.
86 c. Periodic evaluation and consultation to assess an
87 orthosis's effect on the patient's tissue and assure proper
88 fit and function of the orthosis.
89 (5) ORTHOTIST. An individual certified by a national
90 certifying entity to practice orthotics.
91 (6) PEDORTHIC DEVICE. Custom therapeutic shoes that:
92 a. Address a medical condition of the foot below the
93 ankle;
94 b. Are prescribed by an authorized health care
95 practitioner, including diabetic shoes, for the treatment of
96 partial or complete amputation of the foot, foot ulceration,
97 pre-ulcerative callous, or foot deformity, shoe modifications
98 made for therapeutic purposes, partial foot prostheses, and
99 foot orthoses and orthoses for use from the knee and below;
100 and
101 c. Are used for the treatment or alleviation, or both,
102 of a condition that has its origin in the foot.
103 (7) PEDORTHICS. The design, manufacture, modification,
104 or fit of custom shoes, orthoses, and pedorthic devices to
105 prevent or alleviate foot problems caused by disease,
106 congenital defect, overuse, or injury.
107 (8) PEDORTHIST. An individual certified by a national
108 certifying entity to practice pedorthics.
109 (9) PROSTHESIS. A definitive artificial limb that is
110 alignable or articulated or, in lower extremity applications,
111 capable of bearing weight. The term includes an artificial
112 medical device that is not surgically implanted and that is
Page 4

medical device that is not surgically implanted and that is
SB198 INTRODUCED
113 used to replace a missing limb, appendage, or other external
114 human body part and that includes an artificial limb, hand, or
115 foot. The term does not include artificial eyes, ears, dental
116 appliances, ostomy products, devices such as artificial
117 breasts or eyelashes, wigs, or other devices that do not have
118 a significant impact on the musculoskeletal functions of the
119 body.
120 (10) PROSTHETICS. The science and practice of
121 evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling,
122 fitting, aligning, adjusting, or servicing, as well as
123 providing the initial education necessary to accomplish the
124 wearing and use of a prosthesis, through the replacement of
125 external parts of a human body lost due to amputation or
126 congenital deformities or absences. The term includes all of
127 the following:
128 a. The generation of an image, form, or mold that
129 replicates the patient's body or body segment and that
130 requires rectification of dimensions, contours, and volumes
131 for use in the design and fabrication of a socket to accept a
132 residual limb to create an artificial appendage that is
133 designed either to support body weight or to improve or
134 restore function or cosmesis.
135 b. Observational gait analysis and clinical assessment
136 of the requirements necessary to refine and mechanically fix
137 the relative position of various parts of the prosthesis to
138 maximize the function, stability, and safety of the patient.
139 c. Evaluating, consulting, and providing continuing
140 patient care in order to assess the effect of the prosthetic
Page 5

patient care in order to assess the effect of the prosthetic
SB198 INTRODUCED
141 device on the patient's tissues and to assure proper fit and
142 function of the prosthetic device.
143 (11) PROSTHETIST. An individual who is certified by a
144 national certifying entity to practice prosthetics.
145 (b) Beginning October 1, 2026, a prosthetist,
146 orthotist, pedorthist, fitter, assistant, or facility may not
147 provide prosthetic, orthotic, or pedorthic care, or otherwise
148 practice or operate, without a current and valid certification
149 from a national certifying entity.
150 (c) An individual required to be certified pursuant to
151 subsection (b) shall complete not less than half of any
152 continuing education required to maintain a current and valid
153 certification from a national certifying entity through
154 courses and clinical programs offered by the Alabama
155 Prosthetics and Orthotics Association.
156 (d)(1) All persons required to be certified pursuant to
157 subsection (b) shall submit proof of valid certification to
158 the Alabama Prosthetics and Orthotics Association. The
159 association shall keep a record of all certified persons and
160 verify and record all certified individual's completed
161 continuing education.
162 (2) The association may assess an annual fee on
163 certified persons not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars
164 ($250).
165 (3)a. The association shall maintain a dedicated
166 administrative division that is separate from its normal
167 operations for the administration of its duties pursuant to
168 this section. The association shall deposit all funds
Page 6

this section. The association shall deposit all funds
SB198 INTRODUCED
169 collected pursuant to this section in the Alabama Prosthetics
170 and Orthotics Certification Fund that is established in the
171 State Treasury. The fund shall be administered by the Alabama
172 Prosthetics and Orthotics Association to defray costs incurred
173 in carrying out this section.
174 b. Receipts deposited into the fund shall be disbursed
175 only by warrants of the Comptroller drawn upon the State
176 Treasury on itemized vouchers approved by the director of the
177 department. No funds shall be withdrawn or expended except as
178 budgeted and allocated according to Article 4 of Chapter 4 and
179 Chapter 19 of Title 41, Code of Alabama 1975, and only in
180 amounts as stipulated in the general appropriations act, other
181 appropriations acts, or this section. At the end of each
182 fiscal year, any unencumbered balance shall not revert to the
183 State General Fund under Section 41-4-93, Code of Alabama
184 1975.
185 (e)(1) A violation of subsection (b) is a Class B
186 misdemeanor.
187 (2) The Attorney General may bring an action in circuit
188 court to enjoin a violation of this section.
189 Section 2. Chapter 25A of Title 34, Code of Alabama
190 1975, establishing to the Alabama State Board of Prosthetists
191 and Orthotists, is repealed.
192 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
193 1, 2026.
Page 7